Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,261
Environmental Safety Act, how cited.

Sections 81-15,261 to 81-15,291 shall be known and may be cited as the Environmental Safety Act.

Laws 2021, LB148, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB759, § 24.
July 18, 2026